Arkansas, session 2025, SB604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1702 is amended to read as follows:
6-16-1702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Course provider” means an entity that offers individual
courses in person or online, including without limitation:
(A)(i) An online or virtual education provider that
is not a public school district or an open-enrollment public charter school;
(B)(ii) A postsecondary education institution; and
(C)(iii) A business or entity that offers vocational
or technical course work in its field and has been authorized to provide such
courses by the State Board of Education;
(iv) Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and
the Arts; and
(v) An educational entity that is not a public
school district or an open-enrollment public charter school.
(B)(i) A course provider does not include a public school
district or an open-enrollment public charter school.
*TNL389*
04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
(ii)(a) Except as provided under subdivision
(1)(B)(ii)(b) of this section, a public school district or an open-enrollment
public charter school may make one (1) or more courses available to eligible
students under this subchapter.
(b) A public school or an open-enrollment
public charter school with a rating of "D" or "F" under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-
15-2106 and state board rules shall not be eligible to offer courses to
eligible students under this subchapter.
(2) “Eligible student” means any student in grades six through
twelve (6-12) who resides in Arkansas and meets at least one (1) of the
following criteria:
(A) Is attending a public school that does not offer the
course in which the student desires to enroll, as determined by the state
board Division of Elementary and Secondary Education; or
(B) Is attending a public school that received a letter
grade of “C”, “D”, or “F”, or any variation thereof, under §§ 6-15-2105 and
6-15-2106 and state board rules, and would like to take a required course
required for graduation at the eligible student's school through the Course
Choice Program; and
(3) “Non-completion” means that an enrolled student does not
receive a passing grade or credit for the course.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1703 is amended to read as follows:
6-16-1703. Course Choice Program.
(a) There is established the Course Choice Program.
(b) To support student participation, not later than the 2025-2026
2026-2027 school year, the State Board of Education shall promulgate rules on
the Course Choice Program, including a process that includes without
limitation the following:
(1) The determination regarding whether each:
(A) Proposed course provider complies with the law and
state board State Board of Education rules;
(B) Proposal submitted by a proposed course provider is
valid, complete, financially well-structured, and educationally sound;
(C) Proposal submitted by a proposed course provider
provides a plan for collecting data; and
04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
(D) Proposal submitted by a proposed course provider
offers the potential for fulfilling the purposes of this subchapter;
(2) The provision for an independent evaluation of each proposal
submitted by a proposed course provider by a third party with educational,
organizational, legal, and financial expertise; and
(3) The provision for an agreement between the State Board of
Education and course provider that shall include without limitation a plan
for implementing or providing the following:
(A) Administration of state assessments by the course
provider or an eligible student's resident public school district as
determined by the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education and as
required by the school rating system under § 6-15-2101 et seq.;
(B) The public school districts in which the course
provider will operate;
(C) Proposed courses offered, alignment of the courses by
the course provider with the Arkansas academic standards, and the designated
length of each course offered; and
(D) Alignment of the courses offered by the course
provider with approved Arkansas diploma requirements; and
(E) Assurances that the course provider shall, to the best
of its ability, collaborate and coordinate with a local public school
district in which an eligible student is enrolled full time.
(c)(1) The initial authorization of a course provider shall be for a
period of three (3) years.
(2)(A) After the second year of the initial authorization
period, the State Board of Education shall conduct a thorough review of the
course provider's activities and the academic performance of the eligible
students enrolled in courses offered by the course provider in accordance
with the school rating system.
(B) If the performance of the eligible students enrolled
in courses offered by the course provider does not meet performance standards
set by the State Board of Education under the school rating system, the State
Board of Education shall place the course provider on probation.
(d) After the initial three-year authorization period, the State Board
of Education may reauthorize a course provider for additional periods of not
less than three (3) years nor more than five (5) years after thorough review
04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
of the course provider's activities and the achievement of students enrolled
in courses offered by the course provider.
(e) The State Board of Education shall monitor and evaluate the course
provider in accordance with performance expectations set forth by the State
Board of Education in which student achievement is the predominant criterion.
(f)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education division
shall create a process for:
(A) Common course numbering of all courses listed in the
course catalog; and
(B) Determining whether courses are in compliance aligned
with Arkansas state academic standards.
(2) For courses offered by postsecondary educational
institutions that are authorized course providers, the division shall consult
with the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board.
(g) Prior to the 2025-2026 school year, the The division shall create
a course catalog for all courses offered by a course provider, a public
school district, or an open-enrollment public charter school.
(h) The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to administer
the program.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1704(a)(1), concerning policies and
procedures for eligible students established by each local school district
board of directors, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Credits earned through a course provider shall appear on
each eligible student's official transcript and count fully towards the
graduation requirements of any approved Arkansas diploma;

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1704(d)(1), concerning aggregate test
scores of eligible students who participate in the Course Choice Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The aggregate test scores of eligible students under this
subchapter shall be counted included in the annual school performance report
for the public schools in which the eligible students are enrolled full time,
pursuant to rules promulgated by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education.

04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-16-1705 is amended to read as follows:
6-16-1705. Funding — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “per-course amount for a course
provider” means an amount equal to the standard market rate as determined by
a course provider and reported to the Department of Education that is up to
one-sixth (⅙) of ninety percent (90%) eight percent (8%) of the per-pupil
amount each year as determined by the foundation funding amount, established
under § 6-20-2305, allotted per student to each public school district in
which an eligible student resides.
(2) The per-course amount for a public school district or an
open-enrollment public charter school shall be the amount of foundation
funding generated by including an eligible student in the public school
district's or open-enrollment public charter school's average daily
membership under § 6-20-2305 for one (1) or more courses.
(2)(A) Any remaining funds for an eligible student, except those
specified under subsection (c) of this section, shall be returned to the
state or the public school district according to the pro rata share for the
per pupil amount each year as determined by the foundation funding amount for
the public school district in which the eligible student resides.
(B)(3) Transfers of course payments Payment for courses under
this subchapter shall be made by the department on behalf of the responsible
public school district in which an eligible student resides to the authorized
course provider.
(b) A course provider shall receive a per-course amount for each
eligible student.
(c)(1)(b)(1) For each eligible student, an amount equal to ten percent
(10%) of the per-pupil amount according to the pro rata share as determined
each year by the foundation funding amount, established under § 6-20-2305,
allotted per student for the local school district in which an eligible
student resides shall remain with Each eligible student shall be included in
the average daily membership of the public school district in which the
eligible student is enrolled full time for the purpose of generating
foundation funding under § 6-20-2305.
(2) Funds under subdivision (c)(1) (b)(1) of this section shall
be used to finance any administrative or operational costs to support
eligible students enrolled in courses offered by course providers, as
04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
determined by the State Board of Education.
(d)(1)(c)(1) For each eligible student, a course provider shall
receive payment for only the courses in which an eligible student is enrolled
as determined under this subchapter.
(2) The remaining funds for each eligible student up to the
maximum amount for the public school district in which the eligible student
resides as determined each year by the foundation funding, established under
§ 6-20-2305, allotted per student or the actual tuition and fees, as
applicable, shall remain with the participating public school district in
which the student is enrolled full time.
(e)(1)(d)(1) A course provider may charge an eligible student the cost
of tuition in an amount equal to the amount determined by the course provider
and reported to the department shall receive only the per-course amount for a
course provider and shall not charge an eligible student any amount above the
per-course amount for a course provider.
(2) A course provider shall accept the per-course amount as the
total tuition and fees for an eligible student.
(3)(A)(2)(A) Fifty percent (50%) of the per-course amount of
tuition to be for a course provider that is paid or transferred to a course
provider shall be paid or transferred upon after verification of eligible
student enrollment in a course on October 1 of each year and fifty percent
(50%) shall be paid or transferred upon course completion and the eligible
student receiving credit according to the published course length.
(B) If an eligible student does not complete a course,
according to the published course length, in which the course provider has
received the first payment, the course provider shall receive only forty
percent (40%) rather than the remaining fifty percent (50%) of the course
amount, but only if the eligible student completes the course and receives
credit for the course prior to leaving school or graduating from high school.
(C) For non-completion prior to leaving school or
graduating from high school, the course provider shall receive only fifty
percent (50%) of the per-course amount of tuition for course providers that
is paid upon eligible student enrollment in the course.
(4)(A) The remaining ten percent (10%) of the per-pupil amount
according to the pro rata share as determined each year by foundation
funding, established under § 6-20-2305, allotted per student for a public
04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389

SB604
school district in which an eligible student resides shall remain with the
public school in which the eligible student is enrolled full time.
(B) The amount under subdivision (e)(4)(A) of this section
shall be in addition to the ten percent (10%) provided under subsection (c)
of this section.































04/01/2025 4:19:22 PM TNL389